Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-1414.17
Use of excessive force; policy of intervention required; commission; duties.

On or before January 1, 2022:

(1) Each law enforcement agency shall adopt and provide to the commission for approval a policy requiring each law enforcement officer of such agency to intervene when such officer reasonably believes that another law enforcement officer is engaged in a use of excessive force; and

(2) The commission shall develop and distribute a suggested model written policy for use by law enforcement agencies, but the commission shall not mandate the adoption of the model policy except for any particular law enforcement agency which fails to timely create and provide to the commission a policy for the agency as required by this section or when the commission does not approve an agency's policy.

Laws 2021, LB51, § 16.